Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 34 Health Maintenance Organizations
§ 26-34-125.
Administrative procedures.

If the commissioner has cause to believe that grounds for the denial of an application for a certificate of authority exist, or that grounds for the suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority or for the imposition of an administrative penalty exist, he shall notify the health maintenance organization and the administrator by written order specifically stating the grounds for denial, suspension, revocation or administrative penalty. The health maintenance organization or applicant may in writing request a hearing within thirty (30) days from the date of mailing of the order. If no written request is made, the order shall be final upon the expiration of the thirty (30) days.

If the health maintenance organization or applicant requests a hearing pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall issue a written notice of hearing and send it to the health maintenance organization or applicant by certified or registered mail and to the administrator stating:

A specific time for the hearing, which may not be less than twenty (20) nor more than thirty (30) days after mailing of the notice of hearing; and

A specific place for the hearing, which may be either in Cheyenne or in the county where the health maintenance organization’s or applicant’s principal place of business is located.

If a hearing is requested, the administrator, or his designated representative, shall be in attendance at the hearing and shall participate in the proceedings. The administrator’s recommendations and findings with respect to matters relating to the quality of health care services provided in connection with any decision regarding denial, suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority, are conclusive and binding upon the commissioner. After the hearing, or upon the failure of the health maintenance organization to appear at the hearing, the commissioner shall take action as is deemed advisable on written findings which shall be mailed to the health maintenance organization with a copy thereof to the administrator. The commissioner’s action and the administrator’s recommendations and findings are subject to review by the district court. The court, in disposing of the issue before it, may modify, affirm or reverse the commissioner’s order in whole or in part.

The Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act applies to proceedings under this section to the extent it is not in conflict with this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-125

, relating to filings and reports as public documents, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3 as §

26-34-129

.

§ 26-34-126.
Fees; taxes.

Each health maintenance organization subject to this chapter shall pay to the commissioner the following fees:

For filing an application for a certificate of authority or amendment thereto, seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00);

For annual certificate of authority renewal, five hundred dollars ($500.00);

For filing an amendment to the organization documents that requires approval, ten dollars ($10.00) for each document;

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 30, § 2.

Fees charged under this section shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

Each health maintenance organization shall be treated as an authorized insurer for purposes of W.S.

26-2-204

.

Each health maintenance organization shall report direct premium income and shall pay premium taxes in accordance with the provisions of chapter 4 of this code.

Each health maintenance organization shall be treated as a member insurer for purposes of the Wyoming Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act [chapter 42 of this title].

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3; 2000, ch. 30, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-126

, relating to confidentiality of medical information, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3 as §

26-34-130

.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the meaning of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-34-102(a)(xxviii).

§ 26-34-127.
Penalties and enforcement.

The commissioner, instead of suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority under W.S.

26-34-121

, may levy an administrative penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) if reasonable notice in writing is given of the intent to levy the penalty and the health maintenance organization has a reasonable time within which to remedy the defect in its operations which gave rise to the penalty citation. The commissioner may augment this penalty by an amount equal to the sum that he calculates to be the damages suffered by enrollees or other members of the public.

If the commissioner or the administrator for any reason has cause to believe that any violation of this chapter has occurred or is threatened, the commissioner or administrator may give notice to the health maintenance organization and to the representatives, or other persons who appear to be involved in the suspected violation, to arrange a conference with the alleged violators or their authorized representatives for the purpose of attempting to ascertain the facts relating to the suspected violation, and, if it appears that any violation has occurred or is threatened, to arrive at an adequate and effective means of correcting or preventing the violation. Proceedings under this subsection shall not be governed by any formal procedural requirements, and may be conducted in a manner the commissioner or the administrator deems appropriate under the circumstances. However, unless consented to by the health maintenance organization, no rule or order shall result from a conference until the requirements of this section or W.S.

26-34-125

are satisfied.

The commissioner may issue an order directing a health maintenance organization or a representative of a health maintenance organization to cease and desist from engaging in any act or practice in violation of this chapter. Within fifteen (15) days after service of the cease and desist order, the respondent may request a hearing on the question of whether acts or practices in violation of this chapter have occurred. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, and judicial review is available as provided by that act.

In the case of any violation of this chapter, if the commissioner elects not to issue a cease and desist order, or in case of noncompliance with a cease and desist order issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the commissioner may institute a proceeding to obtain injunctive or other appropriate relief in the district court.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act, if a health maintenance organization fails to comply with the net worth requirement of this act, the commissioner is authorized to take appropriate action to assure that the continued operation of the health maintenance organization will not be hazardous to its enrollees.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “W.S.

26-34-121

” for “W.S.

26-34-118

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-127

, relating to the administrator's authority to contract, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 4, as §

26-34-131

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-34-102(a)(xxix).

§ 26-34-128.
Statutory construction and relationship to other laws.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the other provisions of this code relating to insurers and the provisions of title 35 of the Wyoming statutes relating to hospitals or medical service corporations are not applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not apply to:

An insurer or hospital or medical service corporation licensed and regulated pursuant to the insurance law or the hospital or medical service corporation laws of this state except with respect to its health maintenance organization activities authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 2.

Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives, shall not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to solicitation or advertising by health professionals.

Any health maintenance organization authorized under this chapter is not deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt from the provisions of W.S.

33-26-101

through

33-26-511

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 4; 2004, ch. 130, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “Certificate of need requirements under W.S.

35-2-201

through 35-2-214 [repealed] which are applicable to health maintenance organizations.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act”.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-128

, relating to alternative choice, was repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 5.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-34-102(a)(xxviii).

§ 26-34-129.
Filings and reports as public documents.

All applications, filings and reports required under this chapter, except those which are trade secrets or privileged or confidential quality assurance, commercial or financial information, other than any annual financial statement that may be required under W.S.

26-34-110

, shall be treated as public documents.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3.

§ 26-34-130.
Confidentiality of medical information.

Any data or information pertaining to the diagnosis, treatment or health of any enrollee or applicant obtained from that person or from any provider by any health maintenance organization shall be held in confidence and shall not be disclosed to any person except:

To the extent that it may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Upon the express consent of the enrollee or applicant;

Pursuant to statute or court order for the production of evidence or the discovery thereof; or

In case of claim or litigation between the person and the health maintenance organization wherein the data or information is pertinent.

A health maintenance organization is entitled to claim any statutory privileges against such disclosure which the provider who furnished the information to the health maintenance organization is entitled to claim.

A person who, in good faith and without malice, takes any action or makes any decision or recommendation as a member, agent or employee of a health care review committee or who furnishes any records, information or assistance to such a committee shall not be subject to liability for civil damages or any legal action in consequence of that action, nor shall the health maintenance organization which established such a committee or the officers, directors, employees or agents of the health maintenance organization be liable for the activities of any such person. This section shall not be construed to relieve any person of liability arising from treatment of a patient.

The information considered by a health care review committee and the records of its actions and proceedings shall be confidential and not subject to subpoena or order to produce except in proceedings before the appropriate state licensing or certifying agency, or in an appeal, if permitted, from the committee’s findings or recommendations. The information shall not be shared pursuant to W.S. 26-2-113(d). No member of a health care review committee, or officer, director or other member of a health maintenance organization or its staff engaged in assisting such committee, or any person assisting or furnishing information to such committee may be subpoenaed to testify in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding if the subpoena is based solely on such activities. Information considered by a health care review committee and the records of its actions and proceedings which are used pursuant to this subsection by a state licensing or certifying agency or in an appeal shall be kept confidential and shall be subject to the same provision concerning discovery and use in legal actions as are the original information and records in the possession and control of a health care review committee.

To fulfill its obligations under W.S.

26-34-108

, the health maintenance organization shall have access to treatment records and other information pertaining to the diagnosis, treatment or health status of any enrollee.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-34-131.
Administrator's authority to contract.

The administrator, in carrying out his obligations under this chapter may contract with qualified persons to make recommendations concerning the determinations he is required to make. The administrator may accept the recommendations in full or in part.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly §

26-34-127

, and was renumbered as §

26-34-131

by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 4.

§ 26-34-132.
Acquisition of control of or merger of a health maintenance organization.

No person may make a tender for or a request or invitation for tenders of, or enter into an agreement to exchange securities for or acquire in the open market or otherwise, any voting security of a health maintenance organization, or enter into any other agreement if, after the consummation thereof, that person would, directly or indirectly, or by conversion or by exercise of any right to acquire, be in control of the health maintenance organization, and no person may enter into an agreement to merge or consolidate with or otherwise to acquire control of a health maintenance organization, unless, at the time any offer, request or invitation is made or any agreement is entered into, or prior to the acquisition of the securities if no offer or agreement is involved, the person has filed with the commissioner and has sent to the health maintenance organization, information required by W.S. 26-44-103(b)(i) through (v), (c) and (d) and the offer, request, invitation, agreement or acquisition has been approved by the commissioner. Approval by the commissioner shall be governed by W.S. 26-44-103(f) through (h).

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 1.

§ 26-34-133.
Coordination of benefits.

Health maintenance organizations are permitted, but not required, to adopt coordination of benefits provisions to avoid overinsurance and to provide for the orderly payment of claims when a person is covered by two (2) or more group health insurance or health care plans.

If a health maintenance organization adopts coordination of benefits provisions, the provisions shall be consistent with the coordination of benefits provisions that are in general use in the state for coordinating coverage between two (2) or more group health insurance or health care plans.

To the extent necessary for health maintenance organizations to meet their obligations as secondary carriers under the rules for coordination, the organizations shall make payments for services that are:

Received from nonparticipating providers; or

Provided outside their service areas.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 1.

§ 26-34-134.
Written agreement with providers; discrimination prohibited.

Before entering into any written agreement with any provider for the furnishing of health care services to enrollees of a health maintenance organization the organization shall establish terms and conditions to be required of any provider interested in entering into the agreement. In no event shall any Wyoming provider willing to meet the established terms and conditions be denied the right to enter into any written agreement. The established terms and conditions shall not discriminate against any Wyoming provider solely on the basis of an inability to provide specified services within a health maintenance organization’s entire service area. This subsection shall not be construed to require any health maintenance organization to involuntarily employ any person, sell any ownership interest to any person, enter into any partnership with any person or grant staff privileges to any person.

No health maintenance organization shall discriminate in employment, contracting, participation, reimbursement or indemnification against a provider who is acting within the scope of his professional license under applicable state law, based solely on the academic degree of the provider.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 1.

§ 26-34-135.
Application of other laws.

The annual audited financial reports law, title 26, chapter 3, article 3 of the Wyoming statutes, shall apply to domestic health maintenance organizations licensed under this chapter.

The Wyoming Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act, title 26, chapter 44 of the Wyoming statutes, shall apply to domestic health maintenance organizations licensed under this chapter.

Except for those portions of the Wyoming Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act, title 26, chapter 44 of the Wyoming statutes, made applicable by W.S.

26-34-132

and which are in effect prior to January 1, 2017, this section shall be applied to domestic health maintenance organizations licensed under this chapter on and after January 1, 2017.

The Wyoming Insurance Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act, W.S.

26-54-101

through

26-54-108

, shall apply to domestic health maintenance organizations licensed under this chapter.

History.

2016 ch. 24, § 1, effective March 3, 2016; 2018 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2018 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d).

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 24 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.